Maryland, session 2025, SB0915.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
11–205.
(c) (1) In BALTIMORE COUNTY AND Calvert County, a police officer may
enforce the provisions of the Maryland Vehicle Law on a private roadway in [Calvert
County] THE COUNTY that is located within a residential subdivision or community and
used for vehicular travel by residents of the subdivision or community.
(2) FOR THE PERIOD BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2025, AND ENDING
JULY 1, 2028, IN BALTIMORE COUNTY, A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THE
PROVISIONS OF THE MARYLAND VEHICLE LAW ON A PRIVATE ROADWAY WITHIN
THE QUEEN ANNE VILLAGE COMMUNITY IN OWINGS MILLS THAT IS USED FOR
VEHICULAR TRAFFIC BY RESIDENTS OF THE COMMUNITY.
21–101.1.
– 1 –

Ch. 421 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) A person may not drive a motor vehicle in violation of any provision of
this title on any private property that is used by the public in general, or, in BALTIMORE
COUNTY AND Calvert County, on any private [road] ROADWAY located within a:
(I) A residential subdivision or community IN CALVERT COUNTY;
OR
(II) FOR THE PERIOD BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2025, AND
ENDING JULY 1, 2028, THE QUEEN ANNE VILLAGE COMMUNITY IN OWINGS MILLS
IN BALTIMORE COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before September 1,
2028, the Baltimore County Police Department shall report to the members of the
Baltimore County Delegation to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, on the implementation of this Act and whether it has improved
compliance with the Maryland Vehicle Law in the Queen Anne Village community in
Owings Mills.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of September
30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –